Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6832
Human genetic testing; requirements.

All laboratories performing human genetic testing for clinical diagnosis and treatment purposes shall be accredited by the College of American Pathologists or by any other national accrediting body or public agency which has requirements that are substantially equivalent to or more comprehensive than those of the college.

Laws 2001, LB 432, § 4.